Washington statutes.
RCW 3.34.050

District judges—Election.

At the general election in November 1962 and quadrennially thereafter, there shall be elected by the voters of each district court district the number of judges authorized for the district by the district court districting plan. Judges shall be elected for each district and electoral district, if any, by the qualified electors of the district in the same manner as judges of courts of record are elected, except as provided in chapter 29A.52 RCW. Not less than ten days before the time for filing declarations of candidacy for the election of judges for districts entitled to more than one judge, the county auditor shall designate each such office of district judge to be filled by a number, commencing with the number one and numbering the remaining offices consecutively. At the time of the filing of the declaration of candidacy, each candidate shall designate by number which one, and only one, of the numbered offices for which he or she is a candidate and the name of the candidate shall appear on the ballot for only the numbered office for which the candidate filed a declaration of candidacy.

[ 2015 c 53 s 1; 1998 c 19 s 2; 1989 c 227 s 3; 1984 c 258 s 11; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 120 s 8; 1961 c 299 s 14.]

NOTES:

Intent—1989 c 227: See note following RCW 3.38.070.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 120: See note following RCW 29A.52.210.